Utah statutes.
78A-6-313.   Six-month review hearing -- Court determination regarding reasonable efforts by the Division of Child and Family Services and parental compliance with child and family plan requirements.

If reunification efforts have been ordered by the court, a hearing shall be held no more than six months after initial removal of a minor from the minor's home, in order for the court to determine whether:

(1)  the division has provided and is providing "reasonable efforts" to reunify a family, in accordance with the child and family plan established under Section 62A-4a-205; and

(2)  the parent has fulfilled or is fulfilling identified duties and responsibilities in order to comply with the requirements of the child and family plan.

